New York, session 2025-2026, S5591.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The education law is amended by adding a new section 362 2 to read as follows: 3 § 362. Asian American Native Hawaiian Pacific Islander (AANHPI) lead- 4 ership institute. 1. Subject to an appropriation for this purpose, the 5 chancellor of the state university of New York, in consultation with the 6 board of trustees of the state university of New York, shall create an 7 Asian American Native Hawaiian Pacific Islander (AANHPI) leadership 8 institute within the state university of New York to foster the success 9 of Asian American Native Hawaiian Pacific Islander (AANHPI) leaders at 10 the university president and president's cabinet level. Such institute 11 shall develop candidate identification and recruitment efforts, search 12 committee training, professional development and individualized support 13 measures for institute participants, professional assistance program- 14 ming, services, research and resource identification activities, and any 15 other programs deemed necessary to effectuate the intent of this insti- 16 tute. 17 2. The chancellor shall appoint an executive director and an eight 18 member advisory council, to provide guidance and advice to further the 19 development and growth of the institute. The director and the members of 20 the advisory council shall serve for three-year terms, with the director 21 and three advisory council members appointed in the first year of the 22 institute's existence, three other members appointed in the second year, 23 and two members appointed in the third year. The director and advisory EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09354-01-5 S. 5591 2 1 council members may be reappointed at the end of each term in the manner 2 of the original appointment. The director and advisory council shall 3 receive no compensation for their work in conjunction with the insti- 4 tute. 5 3. In considering measures and programming for effectuating the 6 purpose of the institute, the institute shall consider such factors as 7 program cost-effectiveness; the ability of such programs to offer 8 programmatically appropriate, long-term, training, and support services; 9 the ability of such programs to enable individuals to participate in the 10 institute to receive rewarding training, services, and supports; and 11 current and projected employment data at campuses within the state 12 university system. 13 4. The executive director shall prepare and present to the governor, 14 the speaker of the assembly, and the majority leader of the senate at 15 the beginning of each regular session of the legislature a separate 16 report covering, in summary, and in detail, all phases of activity of 17 the institute for the immediately preceding fiscal year. 18 § 2. This act shall take effect on the first of April next succeeding 19 the date on which it shall have become a law.